Washington statutes.
RCW 36.32.125

Adoption of certain regulations proscribed.

Nothing in this chapter shall permit the counties to adopt, by reference or by ordinance, regulations relating to the subject matter contained in chapters 19.28, 43.22, 70.79, or 70.87 RCW.

[ 1971 ex.s. c 117 s 2.]

NOTES:

Adoption of provisions relating to electricians and electrical installations by ordinance proscribed: RCW 19.28.101.